Washington statutes.
RCW 10.25.130

Costs.

When a criminal case is transferred to another county pursuant to this chapter the county from which such case is transferred shall pay to the county in which the case is tried all costs accrued for per diem and mileage for jurors and witnesses and all other costs properly charged to a convicted defendant.

[ 1961 c 303 s 2.]